Kentucky statutes. TITLE LI Unified Juvenile Code
CHAPTER 605 Administrative Matters
605.110.
Smoking cessation services, medical care, and educational programs for committed children — Kentucky Educational Collaborative for State Agency Children — Personnel — Financing.

Any child committed to or in the custody of the cabinet or the Department of Juvenile Justice who is not placed in a location where smoking cessation services are provided may participate in smoking cessation services offered by local health departments or their contracted agents at no cost.

Unless provided otherwise, when any child committed to or in the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet requires medical or surgical care or treatment, the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet may provide the same or arrange for the furnishing thereof by other public or private agencies, and may give consent to the medical or surgical treatment. For this purpose, the services and facilities of local health officers and departments shall be made available, at a cost not to exceed the Medicaid reimbursement rate, to the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet, and as far as practicable, any publicly owned hospital shall provide hospitalization without charge for any such child who is a resident of the political subdivision by which the hospital is owned or operated. This section does not authorize nor shall permission be granted for abortion or sterilization.

Any child placed in a foster home by an agency duly authorized in KRS Chapter 620 to place a child in a foster home shall receive a complete medical, visual, and dental examination by a professional authorized by the Kentucky Revised Statutes to conduct such examinations. Arrangements for a child placed in a foster home to receive such examinations shall be made within two (2) weeks of his placement in a foster home and not less than every twelve (12) months thereafter.

Children maintained in any of the facilities and programs operated or contracted by the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet shall, so far as possible, receive a common school education.

The Kentucky Educational Collaborative for State Agency Children shall be established to serve children in facilities and programs operated or contracted by the Department of Juvenile Justice or the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, residential, day treatment, clinical, and group home programs. All policies and procedures necessary to educate state agency children shall be approved by the Kentucky Board of Education. All duties, responsibilities, rights, and privileges specifically imposed on or granted to the local education administration units shall be imposed on or granted to the Department of Juvenile Justice or the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and contracted agencies with regard to educating agency children. Classrooms for the Kentucky Educational Collaborative for State Agency Children shall be within or near the facilities and programs operated or contracted by the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet. The Kentucky Department of Education, the Department of Juvenile Justice, and the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, Department for Community Based Services, shall develop a biennial plan regarding the educational needs and provisions of educational programs, with emphasis on the coordination of all treatment services and funds available to provide for the education of state agency children. The biennial plan shall include strategies to assure that teacher preparation programs include content related to working with state agency children and that adequate professional development opportunities for better meeting the needs of these students are available for teachers and schools.

Teachers and other staff shall be hired on contract through a local school district or if a local school district is not willing to participate, teachers may be hired by the Kentucky Educational Collaborative for State Agency Children or a contract may be entered into with a private provider of educational services. All certified educational staff hired by the Kentucky Educational Collaborative for State Agency Children shall be members of the Kentucky Teachers’ Retirement System.

Beginning July 1, 1993, the Kentucky Education Collaborative for State Agency Children shall be financed through:

The amount generated by state agency children under the Support Education Excellence in Kentucky program as provided in KRS

157.360

for the guaranteed base and adjustments for the number of at-risk students, exceptional students, and transportation costs;

A per-pupil distribution of professional development funds with the collaborative serving as a consortium for state agency children;

A per-pupil distribution of technology funds in accordance with the state education technology plan pursuant to KRS

156.670

and the formula for the distribution of funds to local school districts;

A per-pupil distribution of textbook funds pursuant to KRS

157.100

and

157.190

;

The funding for school services for state agency children authorized by KRS

158.135

; and

Other grants and entitlements, including federal funds, identified in the implementation plan developed pursuant to paragraph (f) of this subsection for the education of Kentucky’s children.

The commissioner of Juvenile Justice and the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall promulgate administrative regulations, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, with the assistance of the Kentucky Department of Education and upon recommendation of the Kentucky Board of Education regarding the governance, curriculum, and other topics necessary to educate state agency children. The regulations shall:

Provide for the development and implementation of interagency agreements that:

Define the financial responsibility of each state and local agency for providing services to state agency children;

Establish procedures for resolving interagency disputes among agencies that are parties to the agreements; and

Provide procedures for the implementation of the Kentucky statutes regarding school-based decision making, student outcomes, accountability, assessment, rewards and sanctions, technology, staff development, salaries, and the development of coordinated individual treatment, education, and transition plans to ensure compliance with present education and treatment laws and regulations specific to the needs of children in the programs of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

When the placement of a state agency child is changed so that the state agency child must transfer from one school or educational facility to a different school or educational facility, the school or educational facility that the state agency child is leaving shall, within two (2) days of the state agency child leaving, prepare an educational passport for the child, which shall be delivered to the cabinet or the Department of Juvenile Justice. The cabinet or the Department of Juvenile Justice shall, within two (2) days of enrolling a state agency child in a new school or educational facility, present the educational passport to the receiving school or educational facility.

The commissioner of Juvenile Justice and the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and the commissioner of the state Department of Education shall initiate development of a plan for implementation of the Kentucky Educational Collaborative for State Agency Children.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 14, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 9, effective April 10, 1988; 1988, ch. 357, § 12, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 357, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 376, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 358, § 16, effective July 1, 1997; 1996, ch. 362, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 398, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 613, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 433, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 538, § 5, effective April 13, 1998; 1998, ch. 609, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 14, § 58, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 534, § 19, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 257, § 10, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 99, § 661, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 17, § 2, effective July 12, 2006.

605.115.
Access to Medicaid funding for local school districts providing funding matches for services for eligible children with disabilities.

The commissioner of the Department of Juvenile Justice and the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, with the cooperation of the Kentucky Board of Education and the commissioner of education, shall implement policies to assure that local school districts providing a funding match shall have direct access to Medicaid funding as Medicaid providers for the provision of health-related services to eligible children with disabilities under the age of twenty-one (21) years of age. They shall develop policies and procedures so the Department of Education can transfer the local school districts’ matching funds to the Department for Medicaid Services. They shall also review state and federal statutes and regulations to determine the eligibility of local school districts to receive Medicaid reimbursement for health-related services identified on a child’s individual education plan.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 376, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 358, § 17, effective July 1, 1997; 1996, ch. 362, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 426, § 614, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 662, effective June 20, 2005.

605.120.
Payments to home where children are placed — Reimbursement system for foster parents — Pilot projects — Relative caregiver and fictive kin services — Administrative regulations — Decisions regarding haircuts and hairstyles. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The cabinet is authorized to expend available funds to provide for the board, lodging, and care of children who would otherwise be placed in foster care or who are placed by the cabinet in a foster home or boarding home, or may arrange for payments or contributions by any local governmental unit, or public or private agency or organization, willing to make payments or contributions for such purpose. The cabinet may accept any gift, devise, or bequest made to it for its purposes.

The cabinet shall establish a reimbursement system, within existing appropriation amounts, for foster parents that comes as close as possible to meeting the actual cost of caring for foster children. The cabinet shall consider providing additional reimbursement for foster parents who obtain additional training, and foster parents who have served for an extended period of time. In establishing a reimbursement system, the cabinet shall, to the extent possible within existing appropriation amounts, address the additional cost associated with providing care to children with exceptional needs.

The cabinet shall review reimbursement rates paid to foster parents and shall issue a report upon request comparing the rates paid by Kentucky to the figures presented in the Expenditures on Children by Families Annual Report prepared by the United States Department of Agriculture and the rates paid to foster parents by other states. To the extent that funding is available, reimbursement rates paid to foster parents shall be increased on an annual basis to reflect cost of living increases.

The cabinet is encouraged to develop pilot projects both within the state system and in collaboration with private child caring agencies to test alternative delivery systems and nontraditional funding mechanisms.

The cabinet shall track and analyze data on relative and fictive kin caregiver placements. The data shall include but not be limited to:

Demographic data on relative and fictive kin caregivers and children in their care;

Custodial options selected by the relative and fictive kin caregivers;

Services provisioned to relative and fictive kin caregivers and children in their care; and

Permanency benchmarks and outcomes for relative and fictive kin caregiver placements.

By September 30, 2020, and upon request thereafter, the cabinet shall submit a report to the Governor, the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, and the director of the Legislative Research Commission for distribution to the Child Welfare Oversight and Advisory Committee and the Interim Joint Committee on Health and Welfare and Family Services relating to the data tracking and analysis established in this subsection.

Foster parents shall have the authority, unless the cabinet determines that the child’s religion, race, ethnicity, or national origin prevents it, to make decisions regarding haircuts and hairstyles for foster children who are in their care for thirty (30) days or more.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 15, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 10, effective April 10, 1988; 1998, ch. 398, § 8, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 306, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 13, § 1, effective June 21, 2001; 2018 ch. 159, § 14, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 73, § 3, effective June 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 36, § 43, effective July 15, 2020.

605.120.
Payments to home where children are placed — Reimbursement system for foster parents — Pilot projects — Relative caregiver and fictive kin services — Administrative regulations — Decisions regarding haircuts and hairstyles. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The cabinet is authorized to expend available funds to provide for the board, lodging, and care of children who would otherwise be placed in foster care or who are placed by the cabinet in a foster home or boarding home, or may arrange for payments or contributions by any local governmental unit, or public or private agency or organization, willing to make payments or contributions for such purpose. The cabinet may accept any gift, devise, or bequest made to it for its purposes.

The cabinet shall establish a reimbursement system, within existing appropriation amounts, for foster parents that comes as close as possible to meeting the actual cost of caring for foster children. The cabinet shall consider providing additional reimbursement for foster parents who obtain additional training, and foster parents who have served for an extended period of time. In establishing a reimbursement system, the cabinet shall, to the extent possible within existing appropriation amounts, address the additional cost associated with providing care to children with exceptional needs.

The cabinet shall review reimbursement rates paid to foster parents and shall issue a report upon request comparing the rates paid by Kentucky to the figures presented in the Expenditures on Children by Families Annual Report prepared by the United States Department of Agriculture and the rates paid to foster parents by other states. To the extent that funding is available, reimbursement rates paid to foster parents shall be increased on an annual basis to reflect cost of living increases.

The cabinet is encouraged to develop pilot projects both within the state system and in collaboration with private child caring agencies to test alternative delivery systems and nontraditional funding mechanisms.

The cabinet shall track and analyze data on relative and fictive kin caregiver placements. The data shall include but not be limited to:

Demographic data on relative and fictive kin caregivers and children in their care;

Custodial options selected by the relative and fictive kin caregivers;

Services provisioned to relative and fictive kin caregivers and children in their care; and

Permanency benchmarks and outcomes for relative and fictive kin caregiver placements.

By September 30, 2020, and upon request thereafter, the cabinet shall submit a report to the Governor, the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, and the director of the Legislative Research Commission for distribution to the Interim Joint Committee on Health and Welfare and Family Services relating to the data tracking and analysis established in this subsection.

Foster parents shall have the authority, unless the cabinet determines that the child’s religion, race, ethnicity, or national origin prevents it, to make decisions regarding haircuts and hairstyles for foster children who are in their care for thirty (30) days or more.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 15, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 10, effective April 10, 1988; 1998, ch. 398, § 8, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 306, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 13, § 1, effective June 21, 2001; 2018 ch. 159, § 14, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 73, § 3, effective June 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 36, § 43, effective July 15, 2020; 2022 ch. 211, § 29, effective January 1, 2023; 2022 ch. 223, § 13, effective January 1, 2023.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/1/2023). This statute was amended by
2022 Ky. Acts chs. 211 and
223, which are identical and have been codified together.

605.130.
General duties of cabinet.

In addition to the other duties, functions, and responsibilities imposed by law, the cabinet, through its authorized representatives, shall have general supervision and management of all matters contained in KRS

620.150

and

620.170

and shall, wherever possible:

Locate and plan for all children who are dependent, neglected, or abused;

Cooperate with and assist the courts of the various counties;

Assist Circuit Courts through services to children whenever requested by the court. The cabinet may charge a reasonable fee for such services to be taxed as costs by the court;

Assess all referrals received from a court-designated worker, pursuant to direction from the family accountability, intervention, and response team, to determine whether a basis exists to file a dependency, neglect, or abuse petition;

Track and report to the oversight council created in KRS

15A.063

the number of referrals received, the number of investigations made upon those referrals, and the number and type of petitions filed in response;

Identify all youth who have status offense charges and are committed or probated to the cabinet and report the number of committed and probated youth to the oversight council created in KRS

15A.063

; and

Perform such other services as may be deemed necessary for the protection of children.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 16, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 11, effective April 10, 1988; 2002, ch. 257, § 11, effective July 15, 2002; 2014, ch. 132, § 32, effective July 1, 2015.

605.140.
Juvenile Court Advisory Board.

The Chief District Judge may appoint a board of not less than six (6) nor more than ten (10) reputable inhabitants of the county to be called the Advisory Board of the Juvenile Court. The members of the board shall hold office during the pleasure of the judge and shall serve without compensation.

The board shall visit at least once a year all facilities in the county receiving children under KRS Chapters 600 to 645. At least two (2) of the members of the board shall go together on the visits and shall make a report to the board. The board shall report to the court from time to time the condition of the children in the facilities and shall make an annual report to the court.

The board shall advise and cooperate with the Chief District Judge upon all matters affecting the workings of KRS Chapters 600 to 645 and shall recommend to the court any needful measures for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of KRS Chapters 600 to 645. The appointment and utilization of such advisory boards by each District Judge is recommended by the General Assembly as a matter of policy.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 17, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 12, effective April 10, 1988.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Juvenile Court, § 32.10.

605.150.
Authority to promulgate administrative regulations.

The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations to implement the provisions of this chapter.

The Department of Juvenile Justice may promulgate administrative regulations to implement the provisions of this chapter.

The cabinet and the department shall not promulgate administrative regulations under this chapter that conflict.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 18, effective July 1, 1987; 1998, ch. 443, § 12, effective July 15, 1998.

605.160.
Provision of information to those caring for committed children — Show cause hearing.

The cabinet, the Department of Juvenile Justice, and the Kentucky Department of Education shall provide information to the individuals and entities contracting with the cabinet and the Department of Juvenile Justice to provide services and care to children committed to the cabinet or the Department of Juvenile Justice necessary to provide adequate care and services to the committed children they are serving. The cabinet, the Department of Juvenile Justice, and the Kentucky Department of Education shall develop a process that will result in the provision and transfer of information as required by KRS

158.137

,

605.090

,

605.110

,

610.120

,

620.145

, and this section in a timely and efficient manner, including:

Medical passport or history;

Educational passport;

Treatment history; and

Current case plan.

If action by a court is necessary to obtain or release information that the cabinet or the Department of Juvenile Justice deems necessary for the provision of care or services to a committed child, then the cabinet or Department of Juvenile Justice, as the case may be, shall promptly petition the court for permission to receive or release the necessary information.

If the cabinet, the Department of Juvenile Justice, or a school or educational facility as defined in KRS

158.137

fails to provide necessary information within the time frames established by KRS

158.137

,

605.090

,

605.110

,

620.145

, and this section, the person, agency, or entity providing care or services to a child may petition the court having jurisdiction over the child to hold a hearing, at which time the court, if the request for hearing is granted, shall require the cabinet, the Department of Juvenile Justice, or the school or educational facility as defined in KRS 158.137 to show cause as to why it has not provided the necessary information in a timely manner.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 398, § 3, effective July 15, 1998.

605.170.
Reporting of assaults, threats, and menacing conduct against client or staff — Information system to track threats and violent incidents against staff — Safety liaisons.

Each staff member of the department shall report to his or her supervisor any physical or verbal conduct of a client or an individual associated with a client that appears to be threatening or menacing, and any incident of assault, attempted assault, or physical contact that appears to be threatening to any staff member. Any use or threat of use of any type of weapon shall be reported. The supervisor shall report threat or incident information to the commissioner of the department or his or her designee. An employee who reports under this subsection shall be protected from reprisals pursuant to KRS

61.102

.

The department shall establish and maintain an information system and track all reports of threats or incidents involving violence against department staff as required by subsection (1) of this section. The department shall provide, upon request, the number and type of reports received and any information available regarding civil or criminal action or changes to policies and procedures resulting from threats or incidents of violence upon staff.

The department shall designate or establish a safety liaison position within its central office and in each regional office. The regional administrator may designate or establish a safety liaison position in each county office. The duties of the central office safety liaison shall include but not be limited to:

Development and implementation of policies and procedures related to the prevention of violence in the office and in community settings;

Screening and assessment of the level of threat for professional-client interactions;

Facilitation of safety training and safety and first alert protocols with all law enforcement agencies that work with each county office. Existing multidisciplinary teams may be utilized in the development of local safety protocols; and

Administration of a Web-based social worker safety site and a threat and violence incident database.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 140, § 3, effective April 5, 2007.

605.990.
Penalties.

Any person who intentionally violates any provision of this chapter, other than KRS 605.080(4), shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

Any person who intentionally violates KRS 605.080(4), shall be guilty of a violation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 19, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 13, effective April 10, 1988; 1998, ch. 272, § 3, effective July 15, 1998.